Utah statutes.
75-2a-117.   Optional form.
(1)  The form created in Subsection (2), or a substantially similar form, is
presumed valid under this chapter.
(2)  The following form is presumed valid under Subsection (1):
Utah Advance Health Care Directive
(Pursuant to Utah Code Section 75-2a-117)
Part I:  Allows you to name another person to make health care decisions for
you when you cannot make decisions or speak for yourself.
Part II:  Allows you to record your wishes about health care in writing.
Part III:  Tells you how to revoke or change this directive.
Part IV:  Makes your directive legal.
__________________________________________________________________________
My Personal Information
Name:  ____________________________________________________________________
Street Address:  _____________________________________________________________
City, State, Zip Code:
_____________________________________________________________
Telephone:  _________________________  Cell Phone:
____________________________
Birth date: _____________
____________________________________________________________________________
Part I:  My Agent (Health Care Power of Attorney)
A.  No Agent
If you do not want to name an agent: initial the box below, then go to Part
II; do not name an agent in B or C below.  No one can force you to name an
agent.
______  I do not want to choose an agent.
B.  My Agent
Agent's Name:
______________________________________________________________
Street Address:
______________________________________________________________
City, State, Zip Code:
______________________________________________________________
Home Phone:  (    ) _________  Cell Phone:  (    ) _________  Work Phone:  (
) __________
C.  My Alternate Agent
This person will serve as your agent if your agent, named above, is unable or
unwilling to serve.
Alternate Agent's Name:
______________________________________________________
Street Address:
______________________________________________________________
City, State, Zip Code:
______________________________________________________________
Home Phone:  (    ) _________  Cell Phone:  (    ) _________  Work Phone:  (
) __________
D.  Agent's Authority
If I cannot make decisions or speak for myself (in other words, after my
physician or another authorized provider finds that I lack health care
decision making capacity under Section 75-2a-104 of the Advance Health Care
Directive Act), my agent has the power to make any health care decision I
could have made such as, but not limited to:
•  Consent to, refuse, or withdraw any health care.  This may include care
to prolong my life such as food and fluids by tube, use of antibiotics, CPR
(cardiopulmonary resuscitation), and dialysis, and mental health care, such as
convulsive therapy and psychoactive medications.  This authority is subject to
any limits in paragraph F of Part I or in Part II of this directive.
•  Hire and fire health care providers.
•  Ask questions and get answers from health care providers.
•  Consent to admission or transfer to a health care provider or health care
facility, including a mental health facility, subject to any limits in
paragraphs E and F of Part I.
•  Get copies of my medical records.
•  Ask for consultations or second opinions.
My agent cannot force health care against my will, even if a physician has
found that I lack health care decision making capacity.
E.  Other Authority
My agent has the powers below ONLY IF I initial the "yes" option that precedes
the statement.  I authorize my agent to:
YES _____  NO _____     Get copies of my medical records at any time, even
when I can speak for myself.
YES _____ NO _____      Admit me to a licensed health care facility, such as a
hospital, nursing home, assisted living, or other facility for long-term
placement other than convalescent or recuperative care.
F.  Limits/Expansion of Authority
I wish to limit or expand the powers of my health care agent as follows:
____________________________________________________________________________
____________________________________________________________________________
G.  Nomination of Guardian
Even though appointing an agent should help you avoid a guardianship, a
guardianship may still be necessary.  Initial the "YES" option if you want the
court to appoint your agent or, if your agent is unable or unwilling to serve,
your alternate agent, to serve as your guardian, if a guardianship is ever
necessary.
YES _____ NO _____
I, being of sound mind and not acting under duress, fraud, or other undue
influence, do hereby nominate my agent, or if my agent is unable or unwilling
to serve, I hereby nominate my alternate agent, to serve as my guardian in the
event that, after the date of this instrument, I become incapacitated.
H.  Consent to Participate in Medical Research
YES _____ NO _____      I authorize my agent to consent to my participation in
medical research or clinical trials, even if I may not benefit from the
results.
I. Organ Donation
YES _____ NO _____      If I have not otherwise agreed to organ donation, my
agent may consent to the donation of my organs for the purpose of organ
transplantation.
____________________________________________________________________________
Part II:  My Health Care Wishes (Living Will)
I want my health care providers to follow the instructions I give them when I
am being treated, even if my instructions conflict with these or other advance
directives.  My health care providers should always provide health care to
keep me as comfortable and functional as possible.
Choose only one of the following options, numbered Option 1 through Option 4,
by placing your initials before the numbered statement.  Do not initial more
than one option.  If you do not wish to document end-of-life wishes, initial
Option 4.  You may choose to draw a line through the options that you are not
choosing.
Option 1
________ Initial
I choose to let my agent decide.  I have chosen my agent carefully.  I have
talked with my agent about my health care wishes.  I trust my agent to make
the health care decisions for me that I would make under the circumstances.
Additional Comments:
_____________________________________________________________________
Option 2
________ Initial
I choose to prolong life.  Regardless of my condition or prognosis, I want my
health care team to try to prolong my life as long as possible within the
limits of generally accepted health care standards.
Other:
_____________________________________________________________________
Option 3
________ Initial
I choose not to receive care for the purpose of prolonging life, including
food and fluids by tube, antibiotics, CPR, or dialysis being used to prolong
my life.  I always want comfort care and routine medical care that will keep
me as comfortable and functional as possible, even if that care may prolong my
life.
If you choose this option, you must also choose either (a) or (b), below.
______ Initial
(a)  I put no limit on the ability of my health care provider or agent to
withhold or withdraw life-sustaining care.
If you selected (a), above, do not choose any options under (b).
______ Initial
(b)  My health care provider should withhold or withdraw life-sustaining care
if at least one of the following initialed conditions is met:
_____ I have a progressive illness that will cause death.
_____ I am close to death and am unlikely to recover.
_____ I cannot communicate and it is unlikely that my condition will improve.
_____ I do not recognize my friends or family and it is unlikely that my
condition will improve.
_____ I am in a persistent vegetative state.
Other:
_____________________________________________________________________
Option 4
________ Initial
I do not wish to express preferences about health care wishes in this
directive.
Other:
_____________________________________________________________________
Additional instructions about your health care wishes:
______________________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________________
If you do not want emergency medical service providers to provide CPR or other
life sustaining measures, you must work with a physician or APRN to complete
an order that reflects your wishes on a form approved by the Utah Department
of Health.
Part III:  Revoking or Changing a Directive
I may revoke or change this directive by:
1.  Writing "void" across the form, or burning, tearing, or otherwise
destroying or defacing this document or directing another person to do the
same on my behalf;
2.  Signing a written revocation of the directive, or directing another person
to sign a revocation on my behalf;
3.  Stating that I wish to revoke the directive in the presence of a witness
who: is 18 years of age or older; will not be appointed as my agent in a
substitute directive; will not become a default surrogate if the directive is
revoked; and signs and dates a written document confirming my statement; or
4.  Signing a new directive.  (If you sign more than one Advance Health Care
Directive, the most recent one applies.)
Part IV:  Making My Directive Legal
I sign this directive voluntarily.  I understand the choices I have made and
declare that I am emotionally and mentally competent to make this directive.
My signature on this form revokes any living will or power of attorney form,
naming a health care agent, that I have completed in the past.
____________________________________
Date
________________________________________________
Signature
____________________________________________________________________________
City, County, and State of Residence
I have witnessed the signing of this directive, I am 18 years of age or older,
and I am not:
1.  related to the declarant by blood or marriage;
2.  entitled to any portion of the declarant's estate according to the laws of
intestate succession of any state or jurisdiction or under any will or codicil
of the declarant;
3.  a beneficiary of a life insurance policy, trust, qualified plan, pay on
death account, or transfer on death deed that is held, owned, made, or
established by, or on behalf of, the declarant;
4.  entitled to benefit financially upon the death of the declarant;
5.  entitled to a right to, or interest in, real or personal property upon the
death of the declarant;
6.  directly financially responsible for the declarant's medical care;
7.  a health care provider who is providing care to the declarant or an
administrator at a health care facility in which the declarant is receiving
care; or
8.  the appointed agent or alternate agent.
_____________________________________
__________________________________
Signature of Witness                                    Printed Name of
Witness
_____________________________________   ___________         _________
_________
Street Address                                  City                State
Zip Code
If the witness is signing to confirm an oral directive, describe below the
circumstances under which the directive was made.
______________________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________________
